California statutes. Education Code
Unless prior to the day mentioned in the notice, there is paid to the tax collector (a) the full amount for which the property was sold to the state, together with all interest and penalties thereon and all expenses and costs connected therewith, and (b) all subsequent state and county taxes not theretofore paid in full, and all interest and penalties thereon, and all costs and expenses connected therewith, and also (c) the expense of publishing or posting the notice, as the case may be, the tax collector shall on the day, or within 10 days thereafter, execute, acknowledge, and deliver a deed to the regents without any payment, charge, or fee therefor, and shall within five days thereafter report in writing to the Controller the fact of the execution of the deed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92114.

The expense of the publication and posting shall be paid by the Regents of the University of California, unless the expense is paid to the tax collector prior to the day mentioned in the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92115.

If the notice describes two or more pieces of land assessed separately and sold separately to the state, and if all the payments are made within the time prescribed in respect to any one of the pieces separately assessed and sold, the piece paid upon shall not be included in the deed, and the fact of the payment and the amount paid shall be stated in the report to the Controller.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92116.

The deed shall transfer, grant, convey, and confirm to the Regents of the University of California the entire title to the lands, free and clear of all claims and incumbrances whatsoever. Nothing contained in this article shall be held to interfere with the right of the regents to enforce the mortgage or the payment of the debt secured thereby, or to procure a decree of foreclosure and a sale under the decree of all or any of the property described in the mortgage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92117.

The deed shall recite the facts provided in this article as authorizing its execution and is prima facie evidence of the facts and of all matters therein recited and of the ownership of the lands by the regents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92118.

The deed may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county or city and county in which the lands are situated, and upon the expiration of two years after it has been recorded, shall, except as against parties deriving title through a sale and purchase under decree of foreclosure of the mortgage, be conclusive evidence that the complete fee simple title to the property therein described vested at the date of the deed in the Regents of the University of California, free and clear of all claims, liens, charges, and incumbrances whatsoever.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92119.

In any action commenced against the regents before the expiration of two years to question the title of the regents to the property, the deed is prima facie evidence only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92120.

While any mortgage to the regents appears of record and not satisfied of record, no lands which have been sold to the state for taxes and the deed to which has been filed with the Controller, shall be sold or disposed of, except as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Insurance [92130. - 92130.]

92130.

All property of the University of California held in fee or otherwise for purposes of income may be insured against damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Federal Funds for Education in Agriculture and Mechanical Arts [92140. - 92144.]

92140.

The state assents to the provisions of an act passed by Congress, entitled “An act to apply a portion of the proceeds of the Public Lands to the more complete endowment and support of the colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts, established under the provisions of an act of Congress, approved July second, Eighteen Hundred and Sixty-two,” and approved August 30, 1890.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92141.

The state assents to the provisions of an act passed by Congress known as the Smith-Lever Act, and entitled, “An act to provide for cooperative agricultural extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several states receiving the benefits of an act of congress approved July 2, 1862, and of acts supplementary thereto, and the United States Department of Agriculture,” approved May 8, 1914.

The Regents of the University of California are authorized to receive the grants of money appropriated under the act of Congress and to organize and conduct agricultural extension work in accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92142.

The state assents to the provisions of an act passed by Congress, entitled “An act to authorize a more complete endowment of agricultural experiment stations and for other purposes, approved February 24, 1925.”

The Regents of the University of California are authorized to receive grants of money authorized by the act for the benefit of the University of California Agricultural Experiment Station and to use the money in accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the act of Congress.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92143.

The state assents to the provisions of an act passed by Congress known as the Capper-Ketcham Act and entitled “An act to provide for the further development of agricultural extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several States receiving the benefits of the act, entitled "An act donating public lands to the several States and territories which may provide colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanical arts,’ approved July 2, 1862, and all acts supplementary thereto, and the United States Department of Agriculture,” and approved May 22, 1928.

The Regents of the University of California are authorized to receive the grant of money appropriated under the act of Congress, and to organize and conduct extension work in accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92144.

The state assents to the provisions of an act, passed by Congress and entitled “An act to provide for research into basic laws and principles relating to agriculture and to provide for the further development of co-operative agricultural extension work and the more complete endowment and support of land-grant colleges,” approved June 29, 1935, Public Law No. 1827—74th Congress.

The Regents of the University of California are authorized to receive all grants of money appropriated under the act of Congress, and to apply, use, and expend the grants of money for the purposes and in accordance with the terms, conditions, and requirements set forth in the act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Public Funds for Private Organizations [92150. - 92150.]

92150.

No state funds under the control of an officer or employee of the University of California shall ever be used for membership or for any participation involving a financial payment or contribution, on behalf of the university, or any individual employed by or associated therewith, in any private organization whose membership practices are discriminatory on the basis of the characteristics listed in Section 66270. This section does not apply to any public funds that have been paid to an individual employee or officer of the university as salary, or to any funds that are used directly or indirectly for the benefit of student organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Construction of a San Joaquin Valley Campus [92160. - 92160.]

92160.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The San Joaquin Valley is the most populous region of the state without a University of California campus, and has one of the lowest rates of college participation of all regions in California. The San Joaquin Valley consists of the following counties: Alpine, Amador, Calaveras, Fresno, Inyo, Kern, Kings, Madera, Mariposa, Merced, Mono, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, Tulare, and Tuolumne.

(b) The San Joaquin Valley sends fewer than 5 percent of its high school graduates to the University of California, a smaller proportion than the statewide average of almost 8 percent of high school graduates who attend the university.

(c) Access to postsecondary education is determined, in significant measure, by a student’s proximity to college campuses.

(d) California’s economic, social, and cultural development depends upon popular access to an educational system that prepares all of the state’s inhabitants for responsible citizenship and meaningful careers in a multicultural democracy.

(e) The southern San Joaquin Valley is home to a large population of Chicano and Latino Californians, a group that has been historically underrepresented among the University of California student body.

(f) Current projections indicate that California must prepare to accommodate more than 700,000 additional students in its public postsecondary educational institutions within the next 12 years.

(g) In 1988, the Regents of the University of California adopted a long-range enrollment plan to expand the capacity of the university to accommodate an estimated 65,000 additional students by 2005.

(h) California has suffered a severe fiscal crisis that resulted in the underfunding of the University of California and the regents suspending actions and plans to construct additional campuses.

(i) The Legislature recognizes that long-term planning for California’s future higher education needs must continue despite the short-term scarcity of resources.

(j) The Legislature is committed to planning for expansion of its higher education system, with particular emphasis on quality undergraduate education, student and faculty diversity, improved transfer and retention programs, and effective accountability mechanisms.

(k) As evidenced by the adoption of House Resolution 24 and Senate Resolution 18, the Legislature is committed to providing financial support to the University of California for the purpose of meeting the increased need for higher education created by growth in the state’s population.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. The University of California, San Francisco, San Joaquin Valley Regional Campus Medical Education Endowment Fund [92162. - 92166.]

92162.

(a) The University of California, San Francisco, San Joaquin Valley Regional Campus Medical Education Endowment Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Funds received by the University of California or the Controller, for the purposes set forth in subdivision (b), shall be deposited into the University of California, San Francisco, San Joaquin Valley Regional Campus Medical Education Endowment Fund. For purposes of this article, “endowment fund” means the University of California, San Francisco, San Joaquin Valley Regional Campus Medical Education Endowment Fund.

(b) Moneys in the endowment fund shall be allocated to the University of California, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to support the annual operating costs for the development, operation,
 and maintenance of a branch campus of the University of California, San Francisco, School of Medicine in the San Joaquin Valley, and to generate funding through investment earnings for the support of medical education in the San Joaquin Valley.

(c) (1) Moneys in the endowment fund shall initially be invested with the goal of achieving capital appreciation to create a balance sufficient to generate ongoing earnings to cover the estimated annual operating costs associated with the development, operation, and maintenance of a branch campus of the University of California, San Francisco, School of Medicine in the San Joaquin Valley. The balance of the endowment fund shall not be deemed sufficient until a balance of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) is achieved and maintained in the endowment fund.

(2) Upon the determination of the Controller, in
 consultation with the University of California, that the endowment fund balance has attained the goal established in paragraph (1), moneys in the endowment fund shall be invested to generate earnings to fund annual operating costs associated with the development, operation, and maintenance of a branch campus of the University of California, San Francisco, School of Medicine in the San Joaquin Valley. Moneys shall be invested in a manner that best meets the goals of the endowment fund.

(d) The endowment fund may receive donations and contributions from public and private entities, partnerships between public and private entities, fees, cash advances, and transfers from the General Fund as may be specified by law.

(e) Earnings generated by the endowment fund shall be retained by the endowment fund.

(f) Moneys deposited
 in the endowment fund are exempt from the requirements of Sections 11270 to 11275, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 100.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

92164.

(a) (1) Upon the determination of the Controller, in consultation with the University of California, that the endowment fund has adequate principal to annually yield sufficient investment earnings, from the date of determination, to cover the annual costs for the development, operation, and maintenance of a branch campus of the University of California, San Francisco, School of Medicine, supporting 50 students per class, or 200 students total, in the San Joaquin Valley over the next 10 years and to fund the estimated costs of obtaining approval and accreditation from the Liaison Committee on Medical Education, the University of California shall seek approval and accreditation from the Liaison Committee on Medical Education for an expanded branch campus of the University of
 California, San Francisco, School of Medicine in the San Joaquin Valley.

(2) The Controller, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall transfer moneys from the endowment fund to the University of California, in an amount equal to the estimated costs of applying for and obtaining approval and accreditation from the Liaison Committee on Medical Education for a branch campus of the University of California, San Francisco, School of Medicine in the San Joaquin Valley.

(b) Any funds, public or private, allocated from the endowment fund, shall supplement, not supplant, the University of California budget allocations for any fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 756, Sec. 2.   (AB 2202)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

92166.

Nothing in this article shall require the University of California to take any action towards developing a branch campus of the University of California, San Francisco, School of Medicine in the San Joaquin Valley region unless the endowment fund has a balance of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) and the Controller, after consultation with the University of California, has determined that the funds to be allocated are sufficient to support annual operating expenses for a San Joaquin Valley branch campus of the University of California, San Francisco, School of Medicine supporting 50 students per class.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 756, Sec. 2.   (AB 2202)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.6. The University of California Kern County Medical Education Endowment Fund [92168. - 92169.]

92168.

(a) The University of California Kern County Medical Education Endowment Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Funds received by the University of California or the Controller, for the purposes set forth in subdivision (b), shall be deposited into the University of California Kern County Medical Education Endowment Fund. For purposes of this article, “endowment fund” means the University of California Kern County Medical Education Endowment Fund.

(b) Moneys in the endowment fund shall be allocated to the University of California, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to support the annual operating costs for the development, operation,
 and maintenance of a branch campus of an existing University of California School of Medicine in the County of Kern, to conduct a feasibility study related to that branch campus, and to generate funding through investment earnings for the support of medical education in the San Joaquin Valley.

(c) (1) Moneys in the endowment fund shall initially be invested with the goal of achieving capital appreciation to create a balance sufficient to generate ongoing earnings to cover the estimated annual operating costs associated with the development, operation, and maintenance of a branch campus of an existing University of California School of Medicine in the County of Kern.

(2) Upon
 the determination of the Controller, in consultation with the University of California, that the endowment fund balance has attained the goal established in paragraph (1), moneys in the endowment fund shall be invested to generate earnings to fund annual operating costs associated with the development, operation, and maintenance of a branch campus of an existing University of California School of Medicine in the County of Kern. Moneys shall be invested in a manner that best meets the goals of the endowment fund.

(d) The endowment fund may receive donations and contributions from public and private entities, partnerships between public and private entities, fees, cash advances, and transfers from the General Fund as may be specified by law.

(e) Earnings generated by the
 endowment fund shall be retained by the endowment fund.

(f) Moneys deposited in the endowment fund are exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11270) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   (AB 2357)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

92169.

(a) (1) Upon the determination of the Controller, in consultation with the University of California, that the endowment fund has adequate principal to annually yield sufficient investment earnings, from the date of determination, to cover the annual costs for the development, operation, and maintenance of a branch campus of an existing University of California School of Medicine in the County of Kern, the University of California shall seek approval and accreditation from the Liaison Committee on Medical Education for a branch campus of an existing University of California School of Medicine in the County of Kern.

(2) The Controller, upon
 appropriation by the Legislature, shall transfer moneys from the endowment fund to the University of California, in an amount equal to the estimated costs of applying for and obtaining approval and accreditation from the Liaison Committee on Medical Education for a branch campus of an existing University of California School of Medicine in the County of Kern.

(b) Any funds, public or private, received for or generated by the endowment fund shall supplement, not supplant, any current or future funding. Any funds allocated from the endowment fund shall supplement, not supplant, the University of California budget allocations for any fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   (AB 2357)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Campus Expansion Projects and Climate Initiatives [92180. - 92180.]

92180.

(a) (1) Moneys appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act during the 2022–23 to 2024–25, inclusive, fiscal years to directly support one or both of the following at the University of California, Riverside, and the University of California, Merced, shall comply with the provisions of paragraph (2):

(A) Campus expansion projects, which may include, but are not limited to, related capital projects.

(B) University of California climate initiatives, which may include, but are not limited to, related capital projects.

(2) These funds shall supplement and not
 supplant any current or future funding.

(b) Projects that receive funding pursuant to subdivision (a) are a public work for which prevailing wages shall be paid for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(c) (1)   For projects that receive funding pursuant to subdivision (a), the University of California shall obtain an enforceable commitment from any contractor performing work in an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades that the contractor and its subcontractors at every tier will individually use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the work.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if all contractors and subcontractors at every tier performing the work will be bound by a project labor agreement that requires the use of a skilled
 and trained workforce and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(B) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as set forth in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) The University of California may use moneys appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) for capital outlay projects, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 92494, only if, for any affected project, facility, building, or other property, the University of California
 complies with the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 92495.

(e) Commencing July 1, 2023, the University of California shall submit an annual report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, and the Department of Finance on the amount of moneys allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) to the University of California, Riverside, and the University of California, Merced, how these funds were used, and outcomes resulting from the use of these funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 526, Sec. 2.   (AB 2046)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Special Colleges [92200. - 92215.]



  ARTICLE 1. A Law College Affiliated with the University of California [92200. - 92215.]

92200.

(a) In compliance with the process described in subdivision (c), the law college founded in the City of San Francisco in 1878 shall be designated as the College of the Law, San Francisco.

(b) As requested by the Legislature, the college engaged in a consultative process with the Round Valley Indian Tribes, a federally recognized tribal government, and its designees of the Yuki Indian Committee.

(c) (1) A name change shall require all of the following:

(A) The Legislature requests that the Board of Directors of the law college founded in the City of San Francisco in 1878 engage in consultation with representatives of the Round Valley Indian
 Tribes, a federally recognized tribal government, and its designees of the Yuki Indian Committee.

(B) That full consultation with the Round Valley Indian Tribes, a federally recognized tribal government, and its designees of the Yuki Indian Committee approved by the Round Valley Tribes, has concluded.

(C) The Legislature requests that the Board of Directors of the college vote on replacement name names for the college. The Legislature requests that this vote be
 pursuant to consultation described in this subdivision. The Legislature requests that the Board of Directors of the college include the final vote in its minutes for the meeting in which the final vote occurs.

(D) After the board approves the replacement name pursuant to subparagraph (C), the Legislature requests that the Board of Directors of the college make a final recommendation to the Legislature.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “consultation” means the same as that term is defined in Section 65352.4 of the Government Code.

(d) The amendments to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall only become operative if funds are appropriated in the Budget Act of 2022 to the College of the Law, San Francisco for the purpose of designating a name for the law college founded in the City of San Francisco in 1878.

(e) The Legislature requests the Board of Directors of the college to adopt all of the following:

(1) Name the college’s campus library with an appropriate Yuki name or name determined by the Round Valley Indian Tribes.

(2) Ensure that the reading of an annual statement of the history of atrocities committed by S.C. Hastings against the Yuki people occurs at the start of both the convocation and commencement ceremonies, the college’s two signature annual ceremonies.

(3) Reengage in consultation with the Round Valley Indian Tribes if there is a change in the geographical name of the location of the college.

(4) Develop opportunities for collaboration between
 the college’s Moot Court and Trial Advocacy and Competition Groups programs with students of the Round Valley Indian Tribes to provide experience in debate and writing skills.

(5) Institute a moot court competition related to California’s treatment of Native Americans and atrocities committed against them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 20.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

92201.

The college is affiliated with the University of California, and is the law department thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92202.

The college shall afford facilities for the acquisition of legal learning in all branches of the law. To this end it shall establish a curriculum of studies and shall matriculate students who reside at the University of California or elsewhere in the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92203.

The faculty of the University of California shall grant, and the president shall sign and issue, diplomas to the students of the college.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92204.

(a) The business of the college, which includes the power to incur indebtedness, shall be managed by the board of directors. A majority of directors then in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business. The directors shall serve without compensation.

(b) (1) Directors shall serve 12-year terms.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any director in office on January 1, 2023, who was not appointed by the Governor shall be limited to a six-year term from January 1, 2023, to January 1, 2029, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 21.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

92205.

In the investment and management of endowment funds and properties under its jurisdiction, the Board of Directors of the college shall comply, to the extent practicable, with the endowment investment and management policies of the Regents of the University of California. Any variance from the endowment investment and management policies of the regents shall be presented to, and reviewed by, the board, which shall adopt a resolution specifying the reasons for the variance. In addition, the board shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) The use of funds shall be in accordance with the terms specified by the donor.

(b) Before the delegation of any authority to engage in making investments, reallocations, or reinvestments of endowment funds on its behalf, the board shall seek and review the written opinion of the general counsel regarding the propriety of the proposed action under the endowment investment and management policies of the Regents of the University of California then in effect.

(c) “Endowment fund” means a fund derived from a gift, bequest, or grant, the terms of which stipulate that the fund principal remain inviolate and that only the income may be expended.

(d) Annual audits shall be conducted by a certified public accountant firm in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 22.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

92205.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Regents of the University of California provide for a review of the annual audits conducted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 92205 and annually report any violations revealed by these audits to the Board of Directors of the college to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, and to the Legislative Analyst.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 23.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

92206.

Vacancies occurring in the board of directors shall be filled by the Governor and approved by the Senate, a majority of the membership concurring.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 24.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

92207.

The officers of the college are a dean, a registrar, and 11 directors. The dean and registrar shall be appointed by, and may be removed by the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1155, Sec. 31.9.)
-------------------------------------------

92209.

The dean of the college is ex officio a member of the faculty of the University of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92210.

Professorships may be established in the name of any founder who pays to the college the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or such greater sum as may be determined by the directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1155, Sec. 31.11.)
-------------------------------------------

92211.

The sum of 7 percent per annum upon one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be appropriated annually by the state and shall be paid in semiannual payments to the directors of the college.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92212.

If the state fails to pay to the directors of the college the sum of seven thousand dollars ($7,000) annually, pursuant to Section 92211, or if the college ceases to exist, the state shall pay to the heirs or legal representatives of S. C. Hastings, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and all unexpended accumulated interest, unless the failure is caused by mistake or accident, or the omission of the Legislature to make the appropriation at any one session.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92213.

All courses by the college at Sacramento shall be deemed to be given at the site of the college in San Francisco.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92214.

The Director of General Services shall transfer the property located at 55 and 75 Hyde Street in the City and County of San Francisco to the University of California to be used for the benefit of the college for school purposes.

The university shall have the power to sell or lease the property to a nonprofit corporation in order to provide housing facilities for the students, faculty, and employees of the college.

If such property is sold, it shall be sold for its fair market value, with such valuation approved by the Department of Finance, and the proceeds of the sale shall be deposited in the General Fund. If such property is leased, the proceeds of the lease shall be deposited in the General
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 25.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

92215.

The power to incur indebtedness pursuant to Section 92204 shall include, but is not limited to, the power to issue revenue bonds in the name of the Board of Directors of the college and as obligations of the Board of Directors of the college. Revenue bonds may be issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 92400) of Part 57 and, for such purposes, the Board of Directors of the college shall have the same powers to issue revenue bonds for the benefit of the college as are conferred upon the Regents of the University of California for the benefit of the University of California by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 92400) of Part 57, and shall be subject to the limitations imposed therein. Any such bonds issued for the benefit of the Hastings College of the Law, before January 1, 2023,
 shall be issued in the name of Hastings College of the Law without using the name of the University of California. Any such bonds issued for the benefit of the college, on or after January 1, 2023, shall be issued in the name of the college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 26.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Child Development Centers [92300. - 92303.]

92300.

(a) The Regents of the University of California and any other public or private nonprofit agency may contract with the State Department of Education to establish and maintain a child development center on or near each campus of the university pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6.

(b) Operating agencies may accept student fees, parent fees, and private funds to operate campus child development centers, and may be reimbursed for costs that are eligible pursuant to Section 8208.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

92301.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit the regents to expend state funds appropriated for support of the University of California for the direct operating costs of campus child development centers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92302.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, children under two years of age whose parent or parents are students may attend child development centers consistent with the priorities established within this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92303.

Children of students of that particular campus shall have first priority for attendance at a campus child development center.

Each campus child development center maintained pursuant to Section 92300 shall have an advisory council composed of representatives of the parent-users and persons from fields related to the well-being of children.

Student families, as defined in Section 8250.1, whose gross monthly income falls within the fee schedule established pursuant to Section 8249 shall pay fees according to the fee schedule.

Highest priority shall be given to student families with the greatest income deficit, and lowest priority to student families with the greatest income.

For the purposes of assigning eligibility priority, applicant student families shall be grouped according to the amount of their income in one-hundred-dollar ($100) monthly increments. All student families within a particular income range shall be treated as if their incomes were the same, and priority for eligibility within each particular income range shall be assigned on the following basis: 

(1) Single-parent student families.

(2) Two-parent families, where both parents are students or where one parent is a student and the other is working.

Student families who are recipients of public assistance shall be subject to the same assignment of priority as other student families whose incomes fall in the same income range.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. The University of California Revenue Bond Act of 1947 [92400. - 92571.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [92400. - 92411.]

92400.

This chapter may be cited as “the University of California Dormitory Revenue Bond Act of 1947.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92401.

Wherever used or referred to in this chapter, or in any indenture entered into pursuant to this chapter, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter, unless a different meaning appears from the context.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92402.

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means the written evidence of any obligation issued by the regents, payment of which is secured by a pledge of revenues or any part of revenues, as provided in this chapter, in order to obtain funds with which to carry out the purposes of this chapter, irrespective of the form of such obligation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92403.

“Holder of bonds” or “bondholder” or any similar term means any person who shall be the bearer of any outstanding revenue bond or bond registered to bearer or not registered or the registered owner of any such outstanding revenue bond or bond which shall at the time be registered other than to bearer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92404.

“Indenture” means an agreement entered into by the regents pursuant to which revenue bonds are issued regardless of whether such agreement is expressed in the form of a resolution of the regents or by other instrument.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92405.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, corporation, association, copartnership, trust, business trust, or receiver or trustee or conservator for any individual or any such entity. It does not, however, include the state or any public corporation, political subdivision, city, county, district, or any agency of any such entity or of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92406.
